Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB318.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Digital instruction" means lessons, assignments, testing, or activities
delivered through instructional technology;
(b) "Elementary student" means a student enrolled in a public school for in-
person instruction in kindergarten through grade five (5);
(c) "Instructional technology" means a laptop, tablet, computer, Chromebook,
smart device, software platform, or other similar device or platform that is
provided by the district and used for student learning;
(d) "Manipulatives" means hands-on physical learning items, including but
not limited to blocks, counters, cubes, rulers, cards, science materials, and
similar educational tools;
(e) "Public elementary school" means a public school that enrolls elementary
students for in-person instruction; and
(f) "Traditional materials" means printed books, paper-based workbooks,
notebooks, handwriting materials, and physical educational resources.
(2) Digital instruction for elementary students shall not exceed forty-five (45)
minutes per elementary student per instructional day, inclusive of all subjects.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, instructional technology used for
the following purposes may be permitted and shall not count towards the daily
digital instruction time limit for elementary students:
(a) Special education needs documented in an individualized education
program, or IEP, as that term is defined in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1401 or a 504
plan created under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1261
U.S.C. sec. 794;
(b) Assistive or adaptive technology required for student access; and
(c) Teacher-directed demonstrations on a projector, smartboard, or television if
students are not individually using such devices.
(4) A public elementary school shall require:
(a) At least seventy percent (70%) of elementary student assignments to be
completed using paper and a pen, pencil, crayon, or similar writing tool;
(b) Each elementary student to have daily access to traditional materials,
including printed books or printed reading material; and
(c) Physical manipulatives to be incorporated into foundational mathematics
and science instruction for all elementary students.
(5) A public elementary school shall not:
(a) Permit instructional technology to replace traditional teacher instruction
and traditional materials for elementary students for:
1. Reading and literacy;
2. Foundational mathematics;
3. Science lessons requiring physical demonstration or manipulatives;
and
4. Social studies content knowledge;
(b) Assign elementary students homework that requires the use of instructional
technology;
(c) Require elementary students to carry instructional technology to and from
school daily; or
(d) Replace library time with instructional technology reading labs.
(6) Each local board of education shall adopt a written technology use policy
consistent with this section to:
(a) Promote the educational interests of elementary students;
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1261
(b) Ensure that instructional technology supports, rather than supplants,
foundational learning;
(c) Establish daily screen-time limits for elementary students during the
instructional day; and
(d) Establish a process for a parent or guardian to request a lower screen-time
limit for his or her elementary student. The policy shall require that parents
and guardians receive written notice of this process within the first ten (10)
days of each school year.
(7) Each school district shall publish an annual report to the school's website that
includes:
(a) The average minutes per day that an elementary student uses instructional
technology by grade level;
(b) A list of digital instruction services used by elementary students in the
school district;
(c) Verification that traditional materials are provided to elementary students
enrolled in the district as required by subsection (4)(b) of this section; and
(d) Instructions for parents and guardians to request lower screen-time limits
for their elementary student.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:47 PM Jacketed